test/src/morphology/N-biena_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - biena: # -udda med stv och vokalslut
    biena+N+Sg+Nom: biena
    biena+N+Sg+Gen: biednaga
    biena+N+Sg+Acc: biednagav
    biena+N+Sg+Ill: biednagij
    biena+N+Sg+Ine: biednagin
    biena+N+Sg+Ela: biednagist
    biena+N+Sg+Com: biednagijn
    biena+N+Pl+Nom: biednaga
    biena+N+Pl+Gen: biednagij
    biena+N+Pl+Acc: biednagijt
    biena+N+Pl+Ill: biednagijda
    biena+N+Pl+Ine: biednagijn
    biena+N+Pl+Ela: biednagijst
    biena+N+Pl+Com: biednagij
    biena+N+Ess: biednagin
    biena+N+Abe: biednagahtá

 
 
